North Carolina, session 2025, HB983.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-390.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-390.4. Corporal punishment.punishment prohibited.
(a) Each governing body of a public school unit shall determine whether corporal
punishment will be permitted in its public school unit. Notwithstanding a governing body's
prohibition on the use of corporal punishment, school personnel may use Corporal punishment
is prohibited. Use of physical restraint in accordance with federal law and G.S. 115C-391.1 and
reasonable use of force pursuant to G.S. 115C-390.3.G.S. 115C-390.3 shall not be considered
corporal punishment.
(b) To the extent that corporal punishment is permitted, the policies adopted for the
administration of corporal punishment shall include at a minimum the following:
(1) Corporal punishment shall not be administered in a classroom with other
students present.
(2) Only a teacher, principal, or assistant principal may administer corporal
punishment and may do so only in the presence of a principal, assistant
principal, or teacher who shall be informed beforehand and in the student's
presence of the reason for the punishment.
(3) A school person shall provide the student's parent with notification that
corporal punishment has been administered, and the person who administered
the corporal punishment shall provide the student's parent a written
explanation of the reasons and the name of the second person who was present.
*H983-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) The school shall maintain records of each administration of corporal
punishment and the reasons for its administration.
(5) In no event shall excessive force be used in the administration of corporal
punishment. Excessive force includes force that results in injury to the child
that requires medical attention beyond simple first aid.
(6) Corporal punishment shall not be administered on a student whose parent or
guardian has stated in writing that corporal punishment shall not be
administered to that student. Parents and guardians shall be given a form to
make such an election at the beginning of the school year or when the student
first enters the school during the year. The form shall advise the parent or
guardian that the student may be subject to suspension, among other possible
punishments, for offenses that would otherwise not require suspension if
corporal punishment were available. If the parent or guardian does not return
the form, corporal punishment may be administered on the student.
(c) Each governing body of a public school unit shall report annually to the State Board
of Education, in a manner prescribed by the State Board of Education, on the number of times
that corporal punishment was administered. The report shall be in compliance with the federal
Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, and shall include the following:
(1) The number of students who received corporal punishment.
(2) The number of students who received corporal punishment who were also
students with disabilities and were eligible to receive special education and
related services under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act,
20 U.S.C. § 1400, et seq.
(3) The grade level of the students who received corporal punishment.
(4) The race, gender, and ethnicity of the students who received corporal
punishment.
(5) The reason for the administration of the corporal punishment for each student
who received corporal punishment."
SECTION 2. G.S. 115C-12(27) reads as rewritten:
"(27) Reporting Dropout Rates, Corporal Punishment, Suspensions, Expulsions,
and Alternative Placements. – The State Board shall report by March 15 of
each year to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on the
numbers of students who have dropped out of school, been subjected to
corporal punishment, been suspended, been expelled, been reassigned for
disciplinary purposes, or been provided alternative education services. The
data shall be reported in a disaggregated manner, reflecting the local school
administrative unit, race, gender, grade level, ethnicity, and disability status
of each affected student. Such data shall be readily available to the public. The
State Board shall not include students that have been expelled from school
when calculating the dropout rate. The Board shall maintain a separate record
of the number of students who are expelled from school and the reasons for
the expulsion."
SECTION 3. G.S. 115C-107.7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-107.7. Discipline, corporal punishment, Discipline and homebound instruction.
(a) The policies and procedures for the discipline of students with disabilities shall be
consistent with federal laws and regulations.
(a1) Any corporal punishment administered on students with disabilities shall be
consistent with the requirements of G.S. 115C-390.4.
…."
SECTION 4. G.S. 115C-276(r) reads as rewritten:
Page 2 House Bill 983-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(r) To Maintain Student Discipline. – The superintendent shall maintain student
discipline in accordance with Article 27 of this Chapter and shall keep data on each student to
whom corporal punishment was administered, who was suspended for more than 10 days, who
was reassigned for disciplinary reasons, or who was expelled. This data shall include the race,
gender, age, grade level, ethnicity, and disability status of each student, the duration of
suspension for each student, whether alternative education services were provided for each
student, and whether a student had multiple suspensions in that academic year."
SECTION 5. G.S. 115C-390.2(h) reads as rewritten:
"(h) Governing body policies shall include the procedures to be followed by school
officials in suspending, expelling, or administering corporal punishment to suspending or
expelling any student, which shall be consistent with this Article."
SECTION 6. G.S. 6-21.4 is repealed.
SECTION 7. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year. Section 6 of this act does not apply to civil actions arising from the
use of corporal punishment prior to the effective date of this act.
House Bill 983-First Edition Page 3